Illinois, session 104th, HB5602.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Postsecondary and Workforce Readiness Act 5is amended by adding Section 16 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 148/16 new)7    Sec. 16. Senior Gap Semester Pilot Program. ISBE, ICCB, 8IBHE, and ISAC, in furtherance of postsecondary and career 9expectations, shall jointly develop a Senior Gap Semester 10Pilot Program. The Pilot Program shall only be offered to 11students eligible for grade 12. The Pilot Program shall be 12implemented at school districts located within the Regional 13Office of Education 35. The Pilot Program shall offer a 14semester-long program in which a grade 12 student may explore 15a profession or career within the health care industry, 16agriculture industry, manufacturing industry, and early 17childhood education industry.18    ISBE shall consult with statewide organizations 19representing health care, agriculture, manufacturing, and 20early childhood education. After consultation, ISBE shall 21publish and maintain on its website a current database of 22employer champions for work-based learning and career 23readiness systems and programs in each industry. Each employer   HB5602- 2 -LRB104 18215 LNS 31654 b1must consent to its designation as a champion and its 2information being published in the database.